Alabama, session 2026rs, HB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BOARD. The State Board of Pharmacy.
(2) EMPLOYER. Any person that owns or manages a
pharmacy as defined in Section 34-23-1, Code of Alabama 1975,
and which retains, supervises, or terminates pharmacists.
(3) HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL. Any of the following
individuals:
Page 2

individuals:
HB127 INTRODUCED
a. A physician licensed to practice medicine in this
state.
b. A physician assistant licensed by the State Board of
Medical Examiners of the State of Alabama.
c. A certified registered nurse practitioner or a
certified nurse midwife certified by the Board of Nursing.
(4) LICENSE. The same meaning as defined in Section
34-23-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(5) OFF-LABEL MEDICATION. The use of a drug, biological
product, or device approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration (FDA) in any manner other than the use approved
by the FDA.
(b) The board may not revoke, suspend, fail to renew,
or take any other adverse action against a pharmacist's
license based solely on either of the following:
(1) The pharmacist's recommendation of an off-label
medication for the treatment of a disease, condition, or
symptom.
(2) The pharmacist's dispensing of a prescription of an
off-label medication which is ordered by a health care
professional.
(c)(1) An employer may not terminate, discipline, or
take any other adverse action against an employee pharmacist
based solely on either of the following:
a. The pharmacist's recommendation of an off-label
medication for the treatment of a disease, condition, or
symptom.
b. The pharmacist's dispensing of a prescription of an
Page 3

b. The pharmacist's dispensing of a prescription of an
HB127 INTRODUCED
off-label medication which is ordered by a health care
professional.
(2)a. A pharmacist who is terminated or suffers adverse
action by his or her employer for recommending or dispensing
an off-label medication under subdivision (1) may bring an
action for injunctive relief against the employer in the
circuit court of the county in which the off-label medication
was recommended or dispensed.
b. The court in such an action may award injunctive
relief, including ordering reinstatement of the pharmacist to
his or her job position, back pay, costs of the action, and
reasonable attorney fees.
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), a
pharmacist may not dispense a prescription for an off-label
medication when the off-label use has not been adequately
100 tested on humans and the potential harm has not been
101 determined.
102 (e) This section shall not apply to the prescribing,
103 administration, or dispensing of any controlled substances, as
104 defined in Section 20-2-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
105 Section 2. (a) A pharmacy benefits manager (PBM) or a
106 PBM affiliate, both as defined in Section 27-45A-3, Code of
107 Alabama 1975, may not penalize or retaliate against a
108 pharmacist or a pharmacist's employing pharmacy for
109 recommending or dispensing a prescription of an off-label
110 medication as defined in, and in accordance with, Section 1,
111 including, but not limited to, any of the following:
112 (1) Canceling or refusing to renew a contract.
Page 4

(1) Canceling or refusing to renew a contract.
HB127 INTRODUCED
113 (2) Taking legal action for breach of contract.
114 (3) Taking any action otherwise prohibited under
115 Chapter 45A of Title 27, Code of Alabama 1975.
116 (4) Initiating an audit under The Pharmacy Audit
117 Integrity Act, Article 8, Chapter 23, Title 34, Code of
118 Alabama 1975.
119 (b) This section shall not apply to the prescribing,
120 administration, or dispensing of any controlled substances, as
121 defined in Section 20-2-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
122 Section 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
123 to the contrary, the following drugs are authorized for sale
124 or purchase in this state without a prescription or
125 consultation with a health care professional:
126 (1) Ivermectin suitable for human use.
127 (2) Hydroxychloroquine.
128 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
129 1, 2026.
Page 5